Connecticut, session 2026, SB00404.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 29-356 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
As used in this section and sections [29-356] 29-357 to 29-365,
inclusive, as amended by this act:
(1) "Fireworks" means and includes any combustible or explosive
composition, or any substance or combination of substances or article
prepared for the purpose of producing a visible or an audible effect by
combustion, explosion, deflagration or detonation, and includes blank
cartridges, toy pistols, toy cannons, toy canes or toy guns in which
explosives are used, the type of balloons which require fire underneath
to propel the same, firecrackers, torpedoes, skyrockets, Roman candles,
Daygo bombs, and any fireworks containing any explosive or
flammable compound, or any tablets or other device containing any
explosive substance, except that the term "fireworks" shall not include
sparklers, [and] fountains, novelties and toy pistols, toy canes, toy guns
or other devices in which paper caps manufactured in accordance with
the regulations of the United States Interstate Commerce Commission
or its successor agency for packing and shipping of toy paper caps are
used and toy pistol paper caps manufactured as provided [therein] in
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 404
such regulations.
(2) "Sparklers" means a wire or stick coated with pyrotechnic
composition that produces a shower of sparks upon ignition.
(3) "Fountain" means any cardboard or heavy paper cone or
cylindrical tube containing pyrotechnic mixture that upon ignition
produces a shower of colored sparks, crackling effects, whistling effects
or smoke. "Fountain" includes, but is not limited to, (A) a spike fountain,
which provides a spike for insertion into the ground, (B) a base fountain
which has a wooden or plastic base for placing on the ground, [or] (C) a
handle fountain which is a handheld device with a wooden or
cardboard handle, or (D) any nonexplosive and nonaerial item that
produces the primary effect of spinning on the ground, flashing or
strobing, but does not produce a report.
(4) "Novelties" means flitter sparklers, party poppers, novelty smoke
devices, snappers and novelty snakes, as such terms are described in
American Pyrotechnics Association Standard 87-1A, as amended from
time to time.
Sec. 2. Section 29-357 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person,
firm or corporation shall offer for sale, expose for sale, sell at retail or
use or explode or possess with intent to sell, use or explode any
fireworks. A person who is sixteen years of age or older may offer for
sale, expose for sale, sell at retail, purchase, use or possess with intent to
sell or use sparklers, [or] fountains or novelties of not more than one
hundred grams of pyrotechnic mixture per item, which are
nonexplosive and nonaerial, provided (1) such sparklers [and fountains]
do not contain magnesium, except for magnalium or magnesium-
aluminum alloy, (2) such sparklers [and fountains] containing any
chlorate or perchlorate salts do not exceed five grams of composition
per item, and (3) when more than one fountain is mounted on a common
base, the total pyrotechnic composition does not exceed [two] five
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 404
hundred grams.
(b) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
shall adopt [reasonable] regulations, in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 54, for the granting of permits for supervised displays of
fireworks or for the indoor use of pyrotechnics, sparklers and fountains
for special effects by municipalities, fair associations, amusement parks,
other organizations or groups of individuals or artisans in pursuit of
their trade. Such permit may be issued upon application to said
commissioner and after (1) inspection of the site of such display or use
by the local fire marshal to determine compliance with the requirements
of such regulations, and (2) approval of the chiefs of the police and fire
departments, or, if there is no police or fire department, of the first
selectman, of the municipality wherein the display is to be held as is
provided in this section. No such display shall be handled or fired by
any person until such person has been granted a certificate of
competency by the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
Protection, in respect to which a fee of two hundred dollars shall be
payable to the State Treasurer when issued and which may be renewed
every three years upon payment of a fee of one hundred ninety dollars
payable to the State Treasurer, provided such certificate may be
suspended or revoked by said commissioner at any time for cause. Such
certificate of competency shall attest to the fact that such operator is
competent to fire a display. Such display shall be of such a character and
so located, discharged or fired as in the opinion of the chiefs of the police
and fire departments or such selectman, after proper inspection, will not
be hazardous to property or endanger any person or persons. In an
aerial bomb, no salute, report or maroon may be used that is composed
of a formula of chlorate of potash, sulphur, black needle antimony and
dark aluminum. Formulas that may be used in a salute, report or
maroon are as follows: (A) Perchlorate of potash, black needle antimony
and dark aluminum, and (B) perchlorate of potash, dark aluminum and
sulphur. No high explosive such as dynamite, fulminate of mercury or
other stimulator for detonating shall be used in any aerial bomb or other
pyrotechnics. Application for permits shall be made in writing at least
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 404
fifteen days prior to the date of display, on such notice as the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection by
regulation prescribes, on forms furnished by the commissioner, and a
fee of one hundred dollars shall be payable to the State Treasurer with
each such application. After such permit has been granted, sales,
possession, use and distribution of fireworks for such display shall be
lawful for that purpose only. No permit granted [hereunder] under the
provisions of this section shall be transferable. Any permit issued under
the provisions of this section may be suspended or revoked by the
Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection or the local
fire marshal for violation by the permittee of any provision of the
general statutes, any regulation or any ordinance relating to fireworks.
(c) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
may grant variations or exemptions from, or approve equivalent or
100 alternate compliance with, particular provisions of any regulation
101 issued under the provisions of subsection (b) of this section where strict
102 compliance with such provisions would entail practical difficulty or
103 unnecessary hardship or is otherwise adjudged unwarranted, provided
104 any such variation, exemption, approved equivalent or alternate
105 compliance shall, in the opinion of the commissioner, secure the public
106 safety and shall be made in writing.
107 (d) Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of this
108 section shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor, except that (1) any
109 person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of subsection (a) of
110 this section by offering for sale, exposing for sale or selling at retail or
111 possessing with intent to sell any fireworks with a value exceeding ten
112 thousand dollars shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, and (2) any
113 person, firm or corporation violating any provision of subsection (b) of
114 this section or any regulation adopted [thereunder] pursuant to said
115 subsection shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except if death or
116 injury results from any such violation, such person, firm or corporation
117 shall be guilty of a class C felony.
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 404
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-356
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 29-357
PS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5